Utah statutes.
17B-2a-505.   Divisions.
(1)  The board of trustees of each irrigation district shall divide the
district into divisions, each as nearly equal in size to the others as
practicable.
(2)  The number of divisions shall be equal to the number of board of trustees
members.
(3)  At least 30 days before an election of board of trustees members, the
board shall redivide the district into divisions if, since the last time the
board divided the district into divisions:
(a)  the district has annexed land under Chapter 1, Part 4, Annexation;
(b)  land has been withdrawn from the district under Chapter 1, Part 5,
Withdrawal; or
(c)  the number of board of trustees members has been changed.
